Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1704.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-151 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Audio and video recordings from recording equipment attached to


law enforcement vehicles or associated audio recordings from


recording equipment on the person of a law enforcement officer shall


not be muted, paused, or disabled at any time while in the


performance of duties as a law enforcement officer.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3182 CN 1/14/2026 10:37:28 AM





Req. No. 3182 Page 1